Missouri, session 2026, HB2240.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 304.012, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 304.012 and 304.975, to read as follows:
304.012. 1. Every person operating a motor vehicle on the roads and highways of this
state shall drive the vehicle in a careful and prudent manner and at a rate of speed so as not to
endanger the property of another or the life or limb of any person and shall exercise the
highest degree of care.
2. Each motor vehicle operated on the roads and highways of this state shall
have present in the vehicle an appropriately endorsed driver who holds a valid driver's
license and who maintains the ability to actively control the vehicle at all times.
3. No person operating a motor vehicle on the roads and highways of this state shall
perform stunt driving, as such term is defined in section 304.145.
[3.] 4. Any person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a class B
misdemeanor, unless an accident is involved then it shall be a class A misdemeanor.
304.975. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known as the "Autonomous
Vehicle Public Safety Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Autonomous technology", technology installed on a motor vehicle that has
the capability to drive the motor vehicle without the active control or monitoring of a
human operator. The term does not include an active safety system for driver
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2240 2
assistance, including a system to provide electronic blind spot detection, crash
avoidance, emergency braking, parking assistance, adaptive cruise control, lane
keeping assistance, lane departure warning, or traffic jam and queuing assistance,
unless the system, alone or in combination with any other system, enables the vehicle on
which the system is installed to be driven without the active control or monitoring of a
human operator;
(2) "Autonomous vehicle", a motor vehicle equipped with autonomous
technology.
3. An autonomous vehicle shall not be registered in this state unless the
autonomous vehicle meets all state and federal standards and regulations applicable to a
motor vehicle.
4. An autonomous vehicle shall not be engaged in the transport of interstate
commerce or the transporting of goods or passengers, except for personal and
nonrevenue use, unless a human operator is physically present in the autonomous
vehicle and such person has the ability to monitor the autonomous vehicle's
performance and intervene if necessary, including operating or shutting off the
autonomous vehicle. Any human operator shall meet all federal and state licensing
requirements for both autonomous and nonautonomous vehicles.
✔